Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.110

Stay of judgment—Release of errors.

In application to stay proceedings after judgment, the plaintiff shall endorse upon his or her complaint a release of errors in the judgment whenever required to do so by the judge or court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 197; Code 1881 s 162; 1877 p 33 s 162; 1869 p 39 s 160; 1854 p 153 s 120; RRS s 728.]